Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-609
Police; removal.

All members or appointees of the police department shall be subject to removal by the city council in the same manner as provided for members of the fire department.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. V, § 9, p. 499;

C.S.1922, § 3690;

C.S.1929, § 14-609;

R.S.1943, § 14-609.

Removal of firefighters, see section 14-704.

All members of police department are subject to removal by city council in the same manner as provided for members of fire department. State ex rel. Sutton v. Towl, 127 Neb. 848, 257 N.W. 263 (1934).